trunk/apertium-hbs-slv/apertium-hbs-slv.hbs.metadix
    <pardef n="imperf_ref_ra/diti__vblex">
      <!--Infinitive-->
      <e><p><l>di</l><r>di</r></p><par n="inf_ti+fiiI__sfx__ref__vblex__imperf"/></e>
      <!--Imperative-->
      <e><p><l>d</l><r>diti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="ref"/></r></p><par n="imp__sfx__i__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Present-->
      <e><p><l>d</l><r>diti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="ref"/></r></p><par n="pres__sfx__im__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Imperfect-->
      <e><p><l>di</l><r>diti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="ref"/></r></p><par n="imperf__sfx__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Participles-->
      <e><p><l>di</l><r>diti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="ref"/></r></p><par n="lp_o__sfx"/></e>
      <!--    <e><p><l>deći</l><r>diti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="ref"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>--><!--verbose adverbs-->
      <e><p><l>deći</l><r>deći<s n="vblex"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e><!--simple adverbs-->
    </pardef>



    <pardef n="imperf_tv_t/rti__vblex">
      <!--Infinitive-->
      <e><p><l>r</l><r>r</r></p><par n="inf_ti+fiiI__sfx__tv__vblex__imperf"/></e>
      <!--Imperative-->
      <e><p><l>ar</l><r>rti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="imp__sfx__i__vblex"/></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>r</l><r>rti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="imp__sfx__i__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Present-->
      <e><p><l>ar</l><r>rti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="pres__sfx__em__vblex"/></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>r</l><r>rti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="pres__sfx__em__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Imperfect-->
      <e><p><l>ra</l><r>rti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="imperf__sfx__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Participles-->
      <e><p><l>tr</l><r>rti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="lp_o__sfx"/></e>
      <e><p><l>rt</l><r>rti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="pp_sfx_extra__vblex"/></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>rven</l><r>rti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="pp_sfx_extra__vblex"/></e>
      <!--   <e><p><l>arući</l><r>rti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>--><!--verbose adverbs-->
      <e><p><l>arući</l><r>arući<s n="vblex"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e><!--simple adverbs-->
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="imperf_ref_t/rti__vblex">
      <!--Infinitive-->
      <e><p><l>r</l><r>r</r></p><par n="inf_ti+fiiI__sfx__ref__vblex__imperf"/></e>
      <!--Imperative-->
      <e><p><l>ar</l><r>rti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="ref"/></r></p><par n="imp__sfx__i__vblex"/></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>r</l><r>rti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="ref"/></r></p><par n="imp__sfx__i__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Present-->
      <e><p><l>ar</l><r>rti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="ref"/></r></p><par n="pres__sfx__em__vblex"/></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>r</l><r>rti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="ref"/></r></p><par n="pres__sfx__em__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Imperfect-->
      <e><p><l>ra</l><r>rti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="ref"/></r></p><par n="imperf__sfx__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Participles-->
      <e><p><l>tr</l><r>rti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="ref"/></r></p><par n="lp_o__sfx"/></e>
      <!--   <e><p><l>arući</l><r>rti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="ref"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>--><!--verbose adverbs-->
      <e><p><l>arući</l><r>arući<s n="vblex"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e><!--simple adverbs-->
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="imperf_iv_t/rti__vblex">
      <!--Infinitive-->
      <e><p><l>r</l><r>r</r></p><par n="inf_ti+fiiI__sfx__iv__vblex__imperf"/></e>
      <!--Imperative-->
      <e><p><l>ar</l><r>rti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="imp__sfx__i__vblex"/></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>r</l><r>rti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="imp__sfx__i__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Present-->
      <e><p><l>ar</l><r>rti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="pres__sfx__em__vblex"/></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>r</l><r>rti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="pres__sfx__em__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Imperfect-->
      <e><p><l>ra</l><r>rti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="imperf__sfx__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Participles-->
      <e><p><l>tr</l><r>rti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="lp_o__sfx"/></e>
      <!--   <e><p><l>arući</l><r>rti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>--><!--verbose adverbs-->
      <e><p><l>arući</l><r>arući<s n="vblex"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e><!--simple adverbs-->
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="imperf_tv_ču/ti__vblex">
      <!--Infinitive-->
      <e><p><l></l><r></r></p><par n="inf_ti+fiiI__sfx__tv__vblex__imperf"/></e>
      <!--Imperative-->
      <e><p><l></l><r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="imp__sfx__j__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Present-->
      <e><p><l></l><r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="pres__sfx__jem__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Aorist-->
      <e><p><l></l><r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="aor__sfx__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Participles-->
      <e><p><l></l><r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="lp_o__sfx"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ven</l><r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="pp_sfx_extra__vblex"/></e>
      <e><p><l>vši</l><r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e><!--verbose adverbs-->
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="imperf_iv_ču/ti__vblex">
      <!--Infinitive-->
      <e><p><l></l><r></r></p><par n="inf_ti+fiiI__sfx__iv__vblex__imperf"/></e>
      <!--Imperative-->
      <e><p><l></l><r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="imp__sfx__j__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Present-->
      <e><p><l></l><r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="pres__sfx__jem__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Aorist-->
      <e><p><l></l><r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="aor__sfx__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Participles-->
      <e><p><l></l><r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="lp_o__sfx"/></e>
      <e><p><l>vši</l><r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e><!--verbose adverbs-->
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="perf_tv_ču/ti__vblex">
      <!--Infinitive-->
      <e><p><l></l><r></r></p><par n="inf_ti+fiiI__sfx__tv__vblex__perf"/></e>
      <!--Imperative-->
      <e><p><l></l><r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="imp__sfx__j__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Present-->
      <e><p><l></l><r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="pres__sfx__jem__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Aorist-->
      <e><p><l></l><r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="aor__sfx__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Participles-->
      <e><p><l></l><r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="lp_o__sfx"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ven</l><r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="pp_sfx_extra__vblex"/></e>
      <e><p><l>vši</l><r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e><!--verbose adverbs-->
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="perf_iv_ču/ti__vblex">
      <!--Infinitive-->
      <e><p><l></l><r></r></p><par n="inf_ti+fiiI__sfx__iv__vblex__perf"/></e>
      <!--Imperative-->
      <e><p><l></l><r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="imp__sfx__j__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Present-->
      <e><p><l></l><r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="pres__sfx__jem__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Aorist-->
      <e><p><l></l><r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="aor__sfx__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Participles-->
      <e><p><l></l><r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="lp_o__sfx"/></e>
      <e><p><l>vši</l><r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e><!--verbose adverbs-->
    </pardef>

    <e lm="suditi"><i>su</i><par n="imperf_ref_ra/diti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="buditi"><i>bu</i><par n="imperf_ref_ra/diti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="nuditi"><i>nu</i><par n="imperf_ref_ra/diti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="čuti"><i>ču</i><par n="perf_tv_ču/ti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="čuti"><i>ču</i><par n="perf_iv_ču/ti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="čuti"><i>ču</i><par n="imperf_tv_ču/ti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="čuti"><i>ču</i><par n="imperf_iv_ču/ti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dovoditi"><i>dovo</i><par n="imperf_ref_ra/diti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="navoditi"><i>navo</i><par n="imperf_ref_ra/diti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dogoditi"><i>dogo</i><par n="imperf_ref_ra/diti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="svoditi"><i>svo</i><par n="imperf_ref_ra/diti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="privoditi"><i>privo</i><par n="imperf_ref_ra/diti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="trti"><i>t</i><par n="imperf_tv_t/rti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="trti"><i>t</i><par n="imperf_ref_t/rti__vblex"/></e>
